Maryland, session 2026, HB1413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Planning shall study and make
recommendations on the potential economic and fiscal impacts of the retrocession of the
District of Columbia to the State of Maryland.
(b) The study shall exclude the federal enclave of the National Capital Service
Area, which includes the U.S. Capitol, the White House, the U.S. Supreme Court, and
principal federal executive departments.
(c) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the
Department shall:
(1) estimate the impact on State income, sales, and corporate tax and any
other revenues resulting from the addition of District residents and businesses to the State;
(2) evaluate the cost and logistics of assuming responsibility for:
(i) the maintenance and operation of the District’s transportation
infrastructure and public transit systems;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1413*

HOUSE BILL 1413
(ii) the administration and funding of the District’s public school
system; and
(iii) the provision of public safety and emergency services;
(3) assess the impact of assuming or restructuring the District’s municipal
debt, pension obligations, and other long–term liabilities;
(4) analyze the impact on the State’s labor market, housing costs, and
overall gross State product;
(5) identify potential barriers to integrating the District’s laws,
professional licenses, and regulatory requirements into the Annotated Code of Maryland;
and
(6) identify necessary modifications to the Maryland Constitution or the
Maryland Charter for any impacted counties.
(d) In conducting the study, the Department shall consult with the following
stakeholders:
(1) the Comptroller of Maryland;
(2) the Maryland Department of Budget and Management;
(3) the Office of the Attorney General;
(4) representatives from the District of Columbia government;
(5) representatives from Montgomery County and Prince George’s County;
(6) constitutional and legislative policy experts; and
(7) any other stakeholders the Department considers appropriate.
(e) On or before December 1, 2026, the Maryland Department of Planning shall
submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the Senate Budget and Taxation
Committee and the House Appropriations Committee in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.